Utah statutes.
35A-3-312.   Individual development accounts.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Individual development account" means a trust account funded through
periodic contributions by a client and matched by or through a not-for-profit
organization organized under Section 501(c)(3), Internal Revenue Code.
(b)  "Qualified acquisition costs" means the costs of acquiring, constructing,
or reconstructing a residence, including settlement and closing costs.
(c)  "Qualified businesses capitalization expenses" means expenditures for
capital, plant, equipment, working capital, and inventory.
(2)  An individual development account may be established by or on behalf of a
client to enable a client to accumulate funds for the following purposes:
(a)  postsecondary educational expenses after leaving cash assistance,
including tuition, fees, books, supplies, and transportation costs, if paid
from the individual development account directly to an educational institution
that the parent client is attending as part of an employment plan;
(b)  qualified acquisition costs associated with a first-time home purchase if
paid from the individual development account directly to a person to whom the
amount is due;
(c)  amounts paid from an individual development account directly to a
business capitalization account that is established in a federally insured
financial institution and used solely for qualified business capitalization
expenses; or
(d)  the purchase of assistive technologies, vehicle modifications, or home
improvements that will allow a client with a disability to participate in
work-related activities.
(3)  A client may only deposit earned income and funds received from a not-
for-profit organization into an individual development account.
